Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-196
Effect on certain actions, proceedings,
and rights.

(RULLCA
1103) The Nebraska Uniform Limited Liability Company Act does not affect an
action commenced, proceeding brought, or right accrued before January 1, 2011.

Laws 2010, LB888, § 96.